Utah statutes.
53A-6-602.    Designation of hearing officer or panel -- Review of findings.

(1)  UPPAC or a state or local school board charged with responsibility for conducting a hearing may conduct the hearing itself or appoint a hearing officer or panel to conduct the hearing and make recommendations concerning findings.

(2)  UPPAC or the school board shall review the record of the hearing and the recommendations, and may obtain and review, in the presence of the parties or their representatives, additional relevant information, prior to issuing official findings.

(3)  UPPAC shall provide a panel of its members to serve as fact finders in a hearing at the request of the educator who is the subject of the hearing.



Enacted by Chapter 108, 1999 General Session

